Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5435.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to prescribe a tax on the sale and use of certain types of fuel in motor vehicles on the public roads or highways of this state and on certain other types of gas and electricity; to prescribe the manner and the time of collection and payment of this tax and the duties of officials and others pertaining to the payment and collection of this tax; to provide for the licensing of persons involved in the sale, use, or transportation of motor fuel, alternative fuel, and electric fuel and the collection and payment of the tax imposed by this act; to prescribe fees; to prescribe certain other powers and duties of certain state agencies and other persons; to provide for exemptions and refunds and for the disposition of the proceeds of this tax; to provide for appropriations from the proceeds of this tax; to prescribe remedies and penalties for the violation of this act; to allow the promulgation of rules; and to repeal acts and parts of acts. Sec. 53. (1) A person shall not engage in a business activity in this state where for which a license is required by this act unless the person is licensed under this act. (2) A person required to be licensed under this act shall apply for a license on a form or in a format prescribed by the department. (3) An application for a license under this act may contain any information the department may reasonably require to administer this act including the applicant's federal identification number. (4) The following persons currently licensed on April 1, 2001 are not required to obtain a new license under this act and shall be are considered licensed under this act: (a) A person licensed in this state as a supplier on April 1, 2001 shall be is considered licensed as a supplier under this act but only if the person is a terminal operator or a position holder in a terminal on April 1, 2001. (b) A wholesale distributor who on April 1, 2001 possesses a valid exemption certificate issued under former section 12 of former 1927 PA 150 shall be is considered licensed as a fuel vendor under this act. (c) A person licensed in this state as an exporter on April 1, 2001 shall be is considered licensed as an exporter under this act. (d) A person licensed in this state as a liquid fuel hauler on April 1, 2001 shall be is considered licensed as a transporter under this act. (e) A person licensed in this state as a retail dealer of diesel motor fuel on April 1, 2001 shall be is considered licensed as a retail diesel dealer under this act. (5) A person considered licensed under subsection (4) is subject to all of the provisions of this act except those requiring an application for a new license. (6) Except as otherwise provided in this act, a person who is engaged in more than 1 business activity for which a license is required under this act shall be licensed for each business activity. (7) A person who is licensed as a supplier is not required to obtain a separate license for any other business activity for which a license is required under this act except as a retail diesel dealer, as an electric fuel commercial user under sections 157 to 158a, or as an alternative fuel dealer or alternative fuel commercial user under sections 151 to 155. (8) A person who negligently violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of $1,000.00. (9) A person who knowingly violates or knowingly aids and abets another to violate this section is guilty of a felony. Sec. 157. As used in this section and sections 158 and 158a: (a) "Electric fuel" means electricity. (b) "Electric fuel commercial user" means a motor carrier that is a consumer or end user of electric fuel to propel a qualified commercial motor vehicle on the public roads and highways of this state. (c) "Motor carrier" means a person who operates or causes to be operated a qualified commercial motor vehicle on a public road or highway in this state. ?(d) "Qualified commercial motor vehicle" means that term as defined in section 1 of the motor carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211, except that qualified commercial motor vehicle includes a road tractor, truck, or truck tractor used exclusively in this state. Sec. 158. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, an electric fuel commercial user shall pay a tax calculated on the amount of electric fuel consumed in qualified commercial motor vehicles on the public roads or highways in this state. (2) The amount of the tax owed under this section during a time period is the electric fuel rate multiplied by the number of miles driven on this state's public roads during that time period by the electric fuel commercial user's qualified commercial vehicles that consume electric fuel. (3) The electric fuel rate must be calculated by dividing the rate prescribed under section 8(1) for motor fuel for a time period by the electric fuel commercial user's average miles per gallon equivalent for all vehicles in the electric fuel commercial user's fleet that consume electric fuel. (4) The tax imposed under this section must be paid by an electric fuel commercial user to the department in the same manner and under the same procedures as a motor carrier under the motor carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211 to 207.234. (5) The tax imposed under this section does not apply to electric fuel used in this state for the operation of a motor vehicle other than a qualified commercial motor vehicle. (6) The tax imposed on the use of electric fuel under this section is imposed in lieu of all other taxes imposed or to be imposed on the use of electric fuel by this state or a political subdivision of this state, except the taxes imposed by the motor carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211 to 207.234. Sec. 158a. (1) A person shall not act as an electric fuel commercial user unless the person is licensed under this act. (2) To obtain a license as an electric fuel commercial user, an applicant shall file with the department an application on a form or in a format prescribed by the department. The application must include the name and address of the applicant and each place of business to be operated by the applicant at which electric fuel will be used and any other information required by the department. (3) When applying for the license, an applicant for an electric fuel commercial user license shall pay to the department a license fee of $50.00. (4) An applicant for a license or a licensee under this section is subject to the general licensing and bonding requirements of this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5434 (request no. H00427'25). (b) House Bill No. 5433 (request no. H00427'25 a).